Utah statutes.
36-11-404.   Lieutenant governor's procedures.
(1)  The lieutenant governor shall make rules that provide:
(a)  for the appointment of an administrative law judge to adjudicate alleged
violations of this section and to impose penalties under this section;
(b)  procedures for license applications, disapprovals, suspensions,
revocations, and reinstatements that comply with the procedures and
requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.
(2)  The lieutenant governor shall develop forms needed for the registration
and disclosure provisions of this chapter.
